en: Multifunction Writing Instruments
xx: Multifunction Writing Instruments
cs: Multifunkční psací potřeby
da: Multifunktionelle skriveredskaber
de: Multifunktions-Schreibgeräte
es: Útiles de escritura multifunción
fr: Instruments d'écriture multifonctions
it: Strumenti di scrittura multifunzione
ja: 多機能ペン
nl: Multifunctionele schrijfwaren
no: Flerfunksjons-skriveredskaper
pl: Wielofunkcyjne przybory do pisania
pt: Instrumentos de escrita multifuncionais
ru: Многофункциональные письменные принадлежности
sv: Skrivinstrument med flera funktioner
tr: Çok İşlevli Yazım Aletleri

en: Pastels
xx: Pastels
cs: Umělecké pastely
da: Pasteller
de: Pastellkreiden
es: Lápices pastel
fr: Pastels
it: Pastelli
ja: パステル
nl: Pastelkrijtjes
no: Fargekritt
pl: Pastele
pt: Pastéis
ru: Пастель для рисования
sv: Pastellkritor
tr: Pastel Boyalar

en: Pens & Pencils
xx: Pens & Pencils
cs: Pera a tužky
da: Kuglepenne og blyanter
de: Füller & Bleistifte
es: Bolígrafos y lápices
fr: Stylos et crayons
it: Penne e matite
ja: 鉛筆・ペン
nl: Pennen en potloden
no: Penner og blyanter
pl: Pióra\, długopisy i ołówki
pt: Canetas e lápis
ru: Ручки и карандаши
sv: Pennor
tr: Kalemler ve Kurşun Kalemler

en: Pen & Pencil Sets
xx: Pen & Pencil Sets
cs: Sady pera s tužkou
da: Kuglepen- og blyantsæt
de: Füller- & Bleistift-Sets
es: Juegos de bolígrafo y lápiz
fr: Jeux de stylos et crayons
it: Set di penne e matite
ja: 鉛筆セット・ペンセット
nl: Pennen- en potloodsets
no: Penn- og blyantsett
pl: Zestawy piór\, długopisów i ołówków
pt: Conjuntos de canetas e lápis
ru: Наборы ручек и карандашей
sv: Pennset
tr: Kalem ve Kurşun Kalem Setleri

en: Pencils
xx: Pencils
cs: Tužky
da: Blyanter
de: Bleistifte
es: Lápices
fr: Crayons
it: Matite
ja: 鉛筆
nl: Potloden
no: Blyanter
pl: Ołówki
pt: Lápis
ru: Карандаши
sv: Blyertspennor
tr: Kurşun Kalemler

en: Art Pencils
xx: Art Pencils
cs: Malířské tužky
da: Kunstblyanter
de: Zeichenbleistifte & Buntstifte
es: Lápices artísticos
fr: Crayons de dessin
it: Matite da disegno
ja: 絵画用鉛筆
nl: Tekenpotloden
no: Kunstblyanter
pl: Ołówki do szkicowania
pt: Lápis artísticos
ru: Карандаши для художественных работ
sv: Blyertspennor för konst
tr: Resim Kalemleri

en: Writing Pencils
xx: Writing Pencils
cs: Psací tužky
da: Skriveblyanter
de: Schreibbleistifte
es: Lápices para escritura
fr: Crayons d'écriture
it: Matite da scrittura
ja: 筆記用鉛筆
nl: Schrijfpotloden
no: Skriveblyanter
pl: Ołówki do pisania
pt: Lápis para escrever
ru: Простые карандаши
sv: Blyertspennor för skrift
tr: Yazı Kalemleri

en: Mechanical Pencils
xx: Mechanical Pencils
cs: Mechanické tužky
da: Stiftblyanter
de: Druckbleistifte
es: Portaminas
fr: Portemines
it: Matite portamine
ja: シャープペンシル
nl: Vulpotloden
no: Mekaniske blyanter
pl: Ołówki automatyczne
pt: Lapiseiras
ru: Механические карандаши
sv: Mekaniska pennor
tr: Versatil Kalemler

en: Wooden Pencils
xx: Wooden Pencils
cs: Dřevěné tužky
da: Træblyanter
de: Holzbleistifte
es: Lápices de madera
fr: Crayons en bois
it: Matite in legno
ja: 木の鉛筆
nl: Houten potloden
no: Treblyanter
pl: Ołówki drewniane
pt: Lápis de madeira
ru: Деревянные карандаши
sv: Träpennor
tr: Ahşap Kalemler

en: Pens
xx: Pens
cs: Pera
da: Kuglepenne
de: Schreibstifte\, Kugelschreiber & Füller
es: Bolígrafos
fr: Stylos, Stylos bille
it: Penne
ja: ペン
nl: Pennen
no: Penner
pl: Pióra i długopisy
pt: Canetas
ru: Ручки
sv: Bläckpennor
tr: Kalemler

en: Paper Handling
xx: Paper Handling
cs: Práce s papírem
da: Papirhåndtering
de: Papierbearbeitung
es: Manipulación del papel
fr: Traitement du papier
it: Soluzioni per la carta
ja: 書類整理
nl: Papierverwerking
no: Papirhåndtering
pl: Obróbka papieru
pt: Manuseio de papel
ru: Обработка бумаги
sv: Pappershantering
tr: Kağıt İşleri

en: Fingertip Grips
xx: Fingertip Grips
cs: Protiskluzové návleky na prsty
da: Bladvendere
de: Blattwender
es: Protectores para dedos
fr: Doigtiers caoutchouc
it: Fingertip grip
ja: 指キャップ
nl: Vingerhoesjes
no: Gummifingerbøl
pl: Naparstki biurowe
pt: Dedais para papel
ru: Перчатки-напальчники
sv: Fingertutor
tr: Kaydırmaz Parmak Ucu Kaplamaları

en: Hole Punches
xx: Hole Punches
cs: Děrovačky na papír
da: Hullemaskiner
de: Locher
es: Perforadoras de papel
fr: Perforateurs
it: Perforatrici
ja: 穴あけ器
nl: Perforators
no: Hullmaskiner
pl: Dziurkacze
pt: Perfuradores
ru: Дыроколы
sv: Hålslagare
tr: Delgeçler

en: Paper Folding Machines
xx: Paper Folding Machines
cs: Skládací přístroje
da: Papirfoldemaskiner
de: Papierfalzmaschinen
es: Plegadoras de papel
fr: Plieuses à papier
it: Piegatrici da ufficio
ja: 紙折り機
nl: Papiervouwmachines
no: Papirbrettemaskiner
pl: Falcerki
pt: Máquinas de dobrar papel
ru: Фальцевальные машины
sv: Pappersvikmaskiner
tr: Kağıt Katlama Makineleri

en: Paper Joggers
xx: Paper Joggers
cs: Rovnače papírů
da: Papirstablere
de: Papierrüttler
es: Emparejadoras de papel
fr: Taqueuses
it: Pareggiatrici
ja: 紙揃え機
nl: Papierschudders
no: Arkstøtemaskiner
pl: Utrząsarki do papieru
pt: Organizadores de papéis
ru: Сталкивательные машины
sv: Falsmaskiner
tr: Kağıt İstifleme Makineleri

en: Paperweights
xx: Paperweights
cs: Váhy na papír
da: Brevvægte
de: Briefbeschwerer
es: Pisapapeles
fr: Presse-papiers
it: Fermacarte
ja: ペーパーウェイト・文鎮
nl: Presse-papiers
no: Papirvekter
pl: Przyciski do papieru
pt: Pesos de papel
ru: Пресс-папье
sv: Brevpressar
tr: Prespapyeler

en: Pencil Boards
xx: Pencil Boards
cs: Psací podložky
da: Tegneunderlag
de: Schreibunterlagen
es: Protectores de escritorio
fr: Sous-main
it: Plastica protettiva per scrivere
ja: 下敷き
nl: Schrijfonderlegger
no: Skriveunderlag
pl: Podkładki do pisania i rysowania
pt: Shitajiki
ru: Подложки для работы карандашом
sv: Skrivunderlägg
tr: Kurşun Kalem Tahtaları

en: Presentation Supplies
xx: Presentation Supplies
cs: Prezentační materiály
da: Præsentationsmaterialer
de: Präsentationsbedarf
es: Accesorios para presentaciones
fr: Matériel de présentation et d'affichage
it: Forniture per presentazioni
ja: プレゼン用品
nl: Presentatiebenodigdheden
no: Presentasjonsutstyr
pl: Sprzęt do prezentacji
pt: Suprimentos para apresentações
ru: Расходные материалы для презентаций
sv: Presentationsmaterial
tr: Sunum Malzemeleri

en: Chalkboards
xx: Chalkboards
cs: Tabule na psaní křídou
da: Skrivetavler
de: Schreibtafeln
es: Pizarras
fr: Tableaux noirs, Tableau en ardoise
it: Lavagne
ja: 黒板
nl: Schoolborden
no: Krittavler
pl: Tablice kredowe
pt: Quadros de giz
ru: Классные доски
sv: Svarta tavlor
tr: Kara Tahtalar

en: Display Boards
xx: Display Boards
cs: Výstavní plochy
da: Præsentationstavler
de: Ausstellungstafeln
es: Paneles de exposición
fr: Affichages
it: Pannelli di visualizzazione
ja: 展示用ボード・パネル
nl: Presentatieborden
no: Presentasjonstavler
pl: Tablice do prezentacji
pt: Quadros de exibição
ru: Демонстрационные щиты
sv: Presentationstavlor
tr: Sergi Panoları